Hawaii, session 2025, HB1355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $39,044,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the first representative district, as follows: To be expended by the department of education: A.   Ernest Bowden deSilva elementary school, Hawaii Plans, land, design, and equipment and appurtenances for three classroom buildings. Plans                                     $   125,000 Land                                      $ 9,250,000 Design                                    $   125,000 Equipment                                  $ 500,000 Total funding                         $10,000,000 B.   Honokaa elementary school, Hawaii Plans, design, and construction for a covered play court, retaining wall, and covered walkway. Plans                                      $   45,000 Design                                     $  450,000 Construction                                $4,005,000 Total funding                          $4,500,000 C.   Honokaa high and intermediate school, Hawaii Plans, design, and construction for a retaining wall along Mamane street. Plans                                     $    20,000 Design                                    $   200,000 Construction                               $10,000,000 Total funding                         $10,220,000 D.   Kaumana elementary school, Hawaii Plans, design, and construction for drainage mitigation. Plans                                     $   100,000 Design                                    $ 1,000,000 Construction                               $ 8,900,000 Total funding                         $10,000,000 E.   Laupahoehoe community public charter school, Hawaii Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for repairment of the roof. Plans                                      $  250,000 Design                                     $  250,000 Construction                                $ 600,000 Equipment                                   $ 400,000 Total funding                          $1,500,000 F.   Laupahoehoe community public charter school, Hawaii Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for acquisition of new water infrastructure. Plans                                      $  100,000 Design                                     $  100,000 Construction                                $ 500,000 Equipment                                   $ 300,000 Total funding                          $1,000,000 G.   Honokaa high and intermediate school, Hawaii Plans, design, construction, and equipment for a paved parking lot. Plans                                        $100,000 Design                                       $ 75,000 Construction                                  $350,000 Equipment                                     $ 75,000 Total funding                            $600,000 H.   Kalanianaole elementary and intermediate school, Hawaii Plans, design, construction, and equipment for a paved sidewalk. Plans                                        $100,000 Design                                       $ 75,000 Construction                                  $350,000 Equipment                                     $ 75,000 Total funding                            $600,000 I.   Kalanianaole elementary and intermediate school, Hawaii Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for a parking lot. Plans                                        $ 26,000 Design                                       $ 26,000 Construction                                  $ 36,000 Equipment                                     $ 36,000 Total funding                            $124,000 To be expended by the department of transportation: A.   Classification study on roads in limbo, Hawaii Plans for hiring a consultant with the department of transportation to create a classification study about the roads in limbo on the island of Hawaii. Plans                                        $500,000 Total funding                            $500,000 SECTION 2.  (a) The department of transportation, with its hired consultant, shall conduct a study that classifies the roads in limbo recognized by the county of Hawaii, according to a three-tier system as provided in subsection (b). (b)  The classification study regarding the roads in limbo on the island of Hawaii shall categorize the roads based on a three-tier system.  The first tier shall be for roads in limbo that are most frequently used and in immediate need of repair.  The second tier shall be for roads in limbo in need of repair; the need, however, is not immediate.  The third tier shall be for roads in limbo in need of repair that are not used by the majority of individuals on the island of Hawaii. SECTION 3.  No later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027, the department of transportation shall submit to the legislature a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation.  The department shall also submit the report to the department of public works of the county of Hawaii, the Hawaii county council, and the office of the mayor of Hawaii county. SECTION 4.  The appropriations made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________